Hawaii statutes.
[§671D-3] Findings. The legislature
finds the following:

(1) There is an overriding need to provide incentive
and protection for physicians engaging in effective professional peer review;

(2) The occurrence of medical malpractice actions has
become a problem in Hawaii which can be addressed in part by promoting more
effective peer review; and

(3) The threat of private money damage liability
under state laws unreasonably discourages physicians from participating in
effective professional peer review. [L 1989, c 354, pt of §3 and c 363, pt of
§3]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next